Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6612
Home health agency; verify competency.

Each home health agency shall be responsible for verifying in a manner and method prescribed by the department that a home health aide is competent to provide personal care, assistance with the activities of daily living, and basic therapeutic care to patients of the agency.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 127;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 62.